Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1103
Exceptions to act.

The Nebraska Fair Employment Practice Act shall not apply to:

(1) A religious corporation, association, or society with respect to the employment of individuals of a particular religion to perform work connected with the carrying on by such corporation, association, or society of its religious activities; or

(2) The employment of any individual (a) by his or her parent, grandparent, spouse, child, or grandchild or (b) in the domestic service of any person.

Laws 1965, c. 276, § 3, p. 784;

Laws 1993, LB 360, § 7.